Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2517
State elevator inspector; records required.

The state elevator inspector shall maintain a complete and accurate record of the name of the owner or user of each conveyance subject to sections 48-2513 and 48-2514 and a full description of the conveyance and the date when last inspected.

Laws 2006, LB 489, § 17.